Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1214
Communications service provider, defined.

Communications service provider means a cable operator as defined in 47 U.S.C. 522, a provider of information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, or a telecommunications carrier as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, as such sections existed on January 1, 2019. Communications service provider includes a wireless provider.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 14.